Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2135XS (3) 91 jm/jh S.F. 200 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 421.72 Valid exemption certificate 1 ââ penalty. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âExemption certificateâ means a valid certificate whether 4 furnished by the department of revenue or the person using the 5 water that exempts all or a portion of the personâs use of 6 water from the tax imposed pursuant to chapter 423 or 423G. 7 b. âWater utilityâ means a public utility as defined in 8 section 476.1, subsection 2, paragraph âcâ . 9 2. A water utility shall accept and retain a valid exemption 10 certificate and shall not unnecessarily require a person who 11 presents a valid exemption certificate to obtain a sales or 12 water service tax refund from the department of revenue rather 13 than receiving the exemption. 14 3. a. A water utility that does not accept a valid 15 exemption certificate shall pay a civil penalty to the 16 department of revenue equal to the amount of tax refunded to 17 the person who possessed a valid exemption certificate plus 18 interest at the rate in effect under section 421.7. 19 b. The department of revenue shall deposit any penalties and 20 interest collected pursuant to this section into the general 21 fund of the state. 22 4. The department of revenue shall adopt rules to administer 23 this section. 24